Maryland, session 2025, HB1407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
SUBTITLE 17. RIGHTS IN DIGITAL REPLICAS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1407*

HOUSE BILL 1407
11–1701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DIGITAL REPLICA” MEANS A NEWLY CREATED,
COMPUTER–GENERATED, HIGHLY REALISTIC ELECTRONIC REPRESENTATION THAT
IS READILY IDENTIFIABLE AS THE VOICE OR VISUAL LIKENESS OF AN INDIVIDUAL
THAT:
(1) IS EMBODIED IN A SOUND RECORDING, AN IMAGE, AN
AUDIOVISUAL WORK, INCLUDING AN AUDIOVISUAL WORK THAT DOES NOT HAVE ANY
ACCOMPANYING SOUNDS, OR A TRANSMISSION:
(I) IN WHICH THE ACTUAL INDIVIDUAL DID NOT ACTUALLY
PERFORM OR APPEAR; OR
(II) THAT IS A VERSION OF A SOUND RECORDING, AN IMAGE, AN
AUDIOVISUAL WORK, OR A TRANSMISSION IN WHICH THE ACTUAL INDIVIDUAL DID
PERFORM OR APPEAR, BUT THE FUNDAMENTAL CHARACTER OF THE PERFORMANCE
OR APPEARANCE HAS BEEN MATERIALLY ALTERED; AND
(2) DOES NOT INCLUDE, WHEN AUTHORIZED BY THE COPYRIGHT
HOLDER:
(I) THE ELECTRONIC REPRODUCTION OF A SOUND RECORDING
OR AN AUDIOVISUAL WORK;
(II) THE USE OF A SAMPLE OF ONE SOUND RECORDING OR
AUDIOVISUAL WORK WITHIN ANOTHER SOUND RECORDING OR AUDIOVISUAL WORK;
OR
(III) THE REMIXING, MASTERING, OR DIGITAL REMASTERING OF
A SOUND RECORDING OR AN AUDIOVISUAL WORK.
(C) “INDIVIDUAL” MEANS A HUMAN BEING, LIVING OR DEAD.
(D) (1) “ONLINE SERVICE” MEANS:
(I) A PUBLIC–FACING WEBSITE, AN ONLINE APPLICATION, A
MOBILE APPLICATION, OR A VIRTUAL REALITY ENVIRONMENT THAT
PREDOMINANTLY PROVIDES A COMMUNITY FORUM FOR USER–GENERATED

HOUSE BILL 1407 3
CONTENT, SUCH AS SHARING VIDEOS, IMAGES, GAMES, AUDIO FILES, OR OTHER
MATERIAL; OR
(II) A DIGITAL MUSIC PROVIDER, AS DEFINED IN 17 U.S.C. §
115(E).
(2) “ONLINE SERVICE” INCLUDES A SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICE, A
SOCIAL NETWORK, OR AN APPLICATION STORE.
(3) “ONLINE SERVICE” DOES NOT INCLUDE A SERVICE BY WIRE OR
RADIO THAT PROVIDES THE CAPABILITY TO TRANSMIT DATA TO AND RECEIVE DATA
FROM ALL, OR SUBSTANTIALLY ALL, INTERNET ENDPOINTS, INCLUDING ANY
CAPABILITIES THAT ARE INCIDENTAL TO ENABLE THE OPERATION OF THE
COMMUNICATIONS SERVICE OF:
(I) A PROVIDER OF ONLINE SERVICES OR NETWORK ACCESS;
OR
(II) THE OPERATOR OF FACILITIES FOR THE SERVICE.
(E) “PRODUCTION” MEANS THE CREATION OF A DIGITAL REPLICA.
(F) “RIGHT HOLDER” MEANS THE INDIVIDUAL WHOSE VOICE OR VISUAL
LIKENESS IS AT ISSUE WITH RESPECT TO A DIGITAL REPLICA OR ANY PERSON WHO
HAS ACQUIRED, THROUGH A LICENSE, INHERITANCE, OR OTHERWISE, THE RIGHT TO
AUTHORIZE THE USE OF THE VOICE OR VISUAL LIKENESS IN A DIGITAL REPLICA.
(G) “SOUND RECORDING ARTIST” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO CREATES OR
PERFORMS IN SOUND RECORDINGS FOR ECONOMIC GAIN OR FOR THE LIVELIHOOD
OF THE INDIVIDUAL.
11–1702.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE, EACH
INDIVIDUAL OR RIGHT HOLDER SHALL HAVE THE RIGHT TO AUTHORIZE THE USE OF
THE VOICE OR VISUAL LIKENESS OF THE INDIVIDUAL IN A DIGITAL REPLICA.
(2) THE RIGHT IS:
(I) A PROPERTY RIGHT;
(II) NOT ASSIGNABLE DURING THE LIFE OF THE INDIVIDUAL;
AND

HOUSE BILL 1407
(III) LICENSABLE, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, EXCLUSIVELY OR
NONEXCLUSIVELY, BY THE RIGHT HOLDER.
(3) THE RIGHT DOES NOT EXPIRE ON THE DEATH OF THE INDIVIDUAL
REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE RIGHT IS COMMERCIALLY EXPLOITED BY THE
INDIVIDUAL DURING THE INDIVIDUAL’S LIFETIME.
(B) ON THE DEATH OF AN INDIVIDUAL:
(1) THE RIGHT PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE
TRANSFERRED AND LICENSED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY THE EXECUTORS, HEIRS,
ASSIGNS, LICENSEES, OR DEVISEES OF THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
(2) OWNERSHIP OF THE RIGHT MAY BE:
(I) TRANSFERRED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY ANY MEANS OF
CONVEYANCE OR BY OPERATION OF LAW; OR
(II) BEQUEATHED BY WILL OR PASS AS PERSONAL PROPERTY BY
THE APPLICABLE LAWS OF INTESTATE SUCCESSION.
(C) (1) THE RIGHT PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION IS EXCLUSIVE TO:
(I) SUBJECT TO THE LICENSING OF THE RIGHT DURING THE
LIFETIME OF THE INDIVIDUAL IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–1703 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
(II) THE RIGHT HOLDER:
1. FOR A PERIOD OF 10 YEARS AFTER THE DEATH OF
THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
2. IF THE RIGHT HOLDER DEMONSTRATES ACTIVE AND
AUTHORIZED PUBLIC USE OF THE VOICE OR VISUAL LIKENESS OF THE INDIVIDUAL
DURING THE 2–YEAR PERIOD IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EXPIRATION OF THE
10–YEAR PERIOD DESCRIBED IN ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM, SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, FOR AN ADDITIONAL 5–YEAR PERIOD.
(2) THE RIGHT HOLDER DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY CONTINUE TO RENEW THE RIGHT FOR ADDITIONAL 5–YEAR
INCREMENTS IF THE RIGHT HOLDER CAN DEMONSTRATE AUTHORIZED PUBLIC USE
OF THE VOICE OR VISUAL LIKENESS OF THE INDIVIDUAL DURING THE 2–YEAR

HOUSE BILL 1407 5
PERIOD IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EXPIRATION OF EACH ADDITIONAL 5–YEAR
PERIOD.
(D) THE RIGHT PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL TERMINATE ON THE
DATE THAT IS THE EARLIER OF:
(1) THE DATE ON WHICH THE 10–YEAR PERIOD OR ADDITIONAL
5–YEAR PERIOD DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION TERMINATES
WITHOUT RENEWAL; OR
(2) THE DATE THAT IS 70 YEARS AFTER THE DEATH OF THE
INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
11–1703.
(A) A LICENSE DESCRIBED IN § 11–1702(A)(2)(III) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
BE VALID:
(1) WHILE THE INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN § 11–1702(A) OF THIS
SUBTITLE IS LIVING AND ONLY TO THE EXTENT THAT THE LICENSE DURATION DOES
NOT EXCEED 10 YEARS; AND
(2) ONLY IF THE LICENSE AGREEMENT:
(I) IS IN WRITING AND SIGNED BY THE INDIVIDUAL OR AN
AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
(II) INCLUDES A REASONABLY SPECIFIC DESCRIPTION OF THE
INTENDED USES OF THE APPLICABLE DIGITAL REPLICA.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A LICENSE
DESCRIBED IN § 11–1702(A)(2)(III) OF THIS SUBTITLE INVOLVING A LIVING MINOR
IS VALID ONLY IF:
(I) THE LICENSE DURATION DOES NOT EXCEED 5 YEARS;
(II) THE LICENSE AGREEMENT:
1. IS IN WRITING AND SIGNED BY THE INDIVIDUAL OR AN
AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
2. INCLUDES A REASONABLY SPECIFIC DESCRIPTION OF
THE INTENDED USES OF THE DIGITAL REPLICA; AND

HOUSE BILL 1407
(III) A COURT APPROVES THE LICENSE IN ANY MANNER
REQUIRED BY LAW, AS APPLICABLE.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
LICENSE FOR A MINOR SHALL TERMINATE WHEN THE INDIVIDUAL REACHES 18
YEARS OF AGE.
(C) THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY
NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) APPLY IF A LICENSE IS GOVERNED BY A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
AGREEMENT THAT ADDRESSES DIGITAL REPLICAS;
(2) AFFECT THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF A LICENSE OR RELATED
CONTRACT OTHER THAN THOSE DESCRIBED UNDER THIS SECTION; OR
(3) AFFECT A FUTURE INTEREST IN A LICENSE OR RELATED
CONTRACT AFTER THE LICENSE HAS EXPIRED.
(D) A POSTMORTEM TRANSFER OR LICENSE AS DESCRIBED IN §
11–1702(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE VALID ONLY IF THE TRANSFER AGREEMENT
OR LICENSE AGREEMENT IS IN WRITING AND SIGNED BY THE RIGHT HOLDER OR AN
AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE RIGHT HOLDER.
(E) A DIGITAL REPLICA MAY CONTINUE TO BE UTILIZED IN A MANNER
CONSISTENT WITH THE TERMS OF A LICENSE AFTER THE EXPIRATION OR
TERMINATION OF THE LICENSE IF:
(1) THE DIGITAL REPLICA IS EMBODIED IN A SOUND RECORDING, AN
IMAGE, AN AUDIOVISUAL WORK, INCLUDING AN AUDIOVISUAL WORK THAT DOES NOT
HAVE ANY ACCOMPANYING SOUNDS, OR A TRANSMISSION; AND
(2) THE DIGITAL REPLICA IS AUTHORIZED UNDER THE TERMS OF THE
LICENSE TO CONTINUE TO BE USED AFTER THE LICENSE EXPIRES OR TERMINATES.
11–1704.
(A) THE RENEWAL OF A POSTMORTEM RIGHT UNDER § 11–1702(B)(2)(II) OF
THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE EFFECTIVE IF, DURING THE APPLICABLE 2–YEAR
RENEWAL PERIOD SPECIFIED UNDER § 11–1702(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE RIGHT
HOLDER FILES A NOTICE WITH THE SECRETARY OF STATE THAT COMPLIES WITH

HOUSE BILL 1407 7
THE REQUIREMENTS REGARDING FORM AND FILING PROCEDURES AS THE
SECRETARY OF STATE MAY PRESCRIBE BY REGULATION AND THAT CONTAINS:
(1) THE NAME OF THE DECEASED INDIVIDUAL;
(2) A STATEMENT, UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY, THAT THE RIGHT
HOLDER HAS ENGAGED IN ACTIVE AND AUTHORIZED USE OF THE VOICE OR VISUAL
LIKENESS DURING THE APPLICABLE 2–YEAR PERIOD;
(3) THE IDENTITY OF AND CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE RIGHT
HOLDER; AND
(4) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE SECRETARY OF STATE REQUIRES.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
SECRETARY OF STATE:
(I) SHALL MAINTAIN AN UP–TO–DATE DIRECTORY OF
POSTMORTEM DIGITAL REPLICATION RIGHTS REGISTERED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(II) SHALL MAKE THE DIRECTORY DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC FOR INSPECTION ONLINE; AND
(III) MAY CHARGE A REASONABLE FILING FEE TO A RIGHT
HOLDER WHO FILES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE FILING FEE CHARGED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE BASED ON THE COSTS OF
MAINTAINING THE DIRECTORY.
11–1705.
(A) A PERSON SHALL BE LIABLE IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER § 11–1707
OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE PERSON:
(1) PRODUCES A DIGITAL REPLICA WITHOUT CONSENT OF THE
APPLICABLE RIGHT HOLDER; OR
(2) PUBLISHES, REPRODUCES, DISPLAYS, DISTRIBUTES, TRANSMITS,
OR OTHERWISE MAKES AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC A DIGITAL REPLICA WITHOUT
CONSENT OF THE APPLICABLE RIGHT HOLDER.

HOUSE BILL 1407
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, TO INCUR
LIABILITY UNDER THIS SECTION, A PERSON ENGAGING IN AN ACTIVITY DESCRIBED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MUST HAVE ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OR
HAVE WILLFULLY ACTED IN A MANNER TO AVOID ANY KNOWLEDGE THAT:
(I) THE APPLICABLE MATERIAL IS A DIGITAL REPLICA; AND
(II) THE DIGITAL REPLICA WAS NOT AUTHORIZED BY THE
APPLICABLE RIGHT HOLDER.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ACTUAL
KNOWLEDGE CAN BE ESTABLISHED THROUGH A NOTIFICATION THAT SATISFIES THE
REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 11–1706(F) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, IT IS NOT A
VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IF:
(1) (I) THE APPLICABLE DIGITAL REPLICA IS PRODUCED OR USED
IN A BONA FIDE NEWS, PUBLIC AFFAIRS, OR SPORTS BROADCAST OR ACCOUNT; AND
(II) THE DIGITAL REPLICA IS THE SUBJECT OF, OR IS
MATERIALLY RELEVANT TO, THE SUBJECT OF THE BROADCAST OR ACCOUNT;
(2) THE APPLICABLE DIGITAL REPLICA IS A REPRESENTATION OF
THE APPLICABLE INDIVIDUAL AS THE INDIVIDUAL IN A DOCUMENTARY OR IN A
HISTORICAL OR BIOGRAPHICAL MANNER, INCLUDING SOME DEGREE OF
FICTIONALIZATION, UNLESS:
(I) THE PRODUCTION OR USE OF THE DIGITAL REPLICA
CREATES THE FALSE IMPRESSION THE WORK IS AN AUTHENTIC SOUND RECORDING,
IMAGE, TRANSMISSION, OR AUDIOVISUAL WORK IN WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL
PARTICIPATED; OR
(II) THE DIGITAL REPLICA IS EMBODIED IN A MUSICAL SOUND
RECORDING THAT IS SYNCHRONIZED TO ACCOMPANY A MOTION PICTURE OR OTHER
AUDIOVISUAL WORK, EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT THAT THE USE OF THAT DIGITAL
REPLICA IS PROTECTED BY THE FIRST AMENDMENT TO THE U.S. CONSTITUTION OR
ARTICLE 40 OF THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS;
(3) THE APPLICABLE DIGITAL REPLICA IS PRODUCED OR USED
CONSISTENT WITH THE PUBLIC INTEREST IN BONA FIDE COMMENTARY, CRITICISM,
SCHOLARSHIP, SATIRE, OR PARODY;

HOUSE BILL 1407 9
(4) THE USE OF THE APPLICABLE DIGITAL REPLICA IS FLEETING OR
NEGLIGIBLE; OR
(5) THE APPLICABLE DIGITAL REPLICA IS USED IN AN
ADVERTISEMENT OR COMMERCIAL ANNOUNCEMENT FOR A PURPOSE DESCRIBED IN
ITEMS (1) THROUGH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND THE APPLICABLE DIGITAL
REPLICA IS RELEVANT TO THE SUBJECT OF THE WORK BEING ADVERTISED OR
ANNOUNCED.
(D) SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF THE APPLICABLE
DIGITAL REPLICA IS USED TO DEPICT SEXUALLY EXPLICIT CONDUCT, AS DEFINED IN
18 U.S.C. § 2256(2)(A).
11–1706.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON MAY NOT BE
SECONDARILY LIABLE FOR A VIOLATION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR
MANUFACTURING, IMPORTING, OFFERING TO THE PUBLIC, PROVIDING, OR
OTHERWISE DISTRIBUTING A PRODUCT OR SERVICE UNLESS THE PRODUCT OR
SERVICE:
(1) IS PRIMARILY DESIGNED TO PRODUCE ONE OR MORE
UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICAS;
(2) HAS ONLY LIMITED COMMERCIALLY SIGNIFICANT PURPOSE OR
USE OTHER THAN TO PRODUCE AN UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA; OR
(3) IS MARKETED, ADVERTISED, OR OTHERWISE PROMOTED BY THAT
PERSON OR ANOTHER ACTING IN CONCERT WITH THAT PERSON WITH THAT
PERSON’S KNOWLEDGE FOR USE IN PRODUCING AN UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL
REPLICA.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, AN ONLINE SERVICE
MAY NOT BE HELD LIABLE FOR A VIOLATION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR REFERRING
OR LINKING A USER TO AN UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA, OR BY CARRYING OUT
AN ACTIVITY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, IF THE ONLINE
SERVICE REMOVES OR DISABLES ACCESS TO THE MATERIAL THAT IS CLAIMED TO BE
AN UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA AS SOON AS IS TECHNICALLY AND
PRACTICALLY FEASIBLE FOR THE ONLINE SERVICE.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, AN ONLINE SERVICE
MAY NOT BE HELD LIABLE FOR A VIOLATION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR STORING
THIRD–PARTY–PROVIDED MATERIAL THAT RESIDES ON A SYSTEM OR NETWORK

HOUSE BILL 1407
CONTROLLED OR OPERATED BY OR FOR THE ONLINE SERVICE IF, AFTER RECEIVING
A NOTIFICATION THAT SATISFIES SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, THE ONLINE
SERVICE:
(1) REMOVES OR DISABLES ACCESS TO ALL INSTANCES OF THE
MATERIAL, OR AN ACTIVITY USING THE MATERIAL, THAT IS CLAIMED TO BE AN
UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA AS SOON AS IS TECHNICALLY AND PRACTICALLY
FEASIBLE FOR THE ONLINE SERVICE; AND
(2) AFTER REMOVING OR DISABLING ACCESS, TAKES REASONABLE
STEPS TO PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE THIRD PARTY THAT PROVIDED THE MATERIAL
THAT THE ONLINE SERVICE HAS REMOVED OR DISABLED ACCESS TO THE MATERIAL.
(D) THE LIMITATIONS ON LIABILITY ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION
APPLY TO AN ONLINE SERVICE ONLY IF THE ONLINE SERVICE:
(1) HAS DESIGNATED AN AGENT TO RECEIVE NOTIFICATIONS UNDER
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) PROVIDES TO THE SECRETARY OF STATE AND MAKES AVAILABLE
THROUGH THE ONLINE SERVICE, INCLUDING ON THE WEBSITE OF THE ONLINE
SERVICE IN A LOCATION ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC, THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION:
(I) THE NAME, ADDRESS, TELEPHONE NUMBER, AND E–MAIL
ADDRESS OF THE AGENT; AND
(II) ANY OTHER CONTACT INFORMATION THAT THE SECRETARY
OF STATE DETERMINES APPROPRIATE.
(E) THE SECRETARY OF STATE:
(1) SHALL MAINTAIN A CURRENT DIRECTORY OF DESIGNATED
AGENTS FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION;
(2) SHALL MAKE THE DIRECTORY DESCRIBED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC FOR INSPECTION, INCLUDING THROUGH
THE INTERNET; AND
(3) MAY REQUIRE PAYMENT OF A REASONABLE FEE BY ONLINE
SERVICES TO COVER THE COSTS OF MAINTAINING THE DIRECTORY ESTABLISHED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1407 11
(F) (1) A NOTIFICATION TO AN ONLINE SERVICE ALLEGING A VIOLATION
OF THE RIGHT DESCRIBED IN § 11–1702 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE A WRITTEN
COMMUNICATION PROVIDED TO THE DESIGNATED AGENT OF AN ONLINE SERVICE
THAT INCLUDES:
(I) A PHYSICAL OR ELECTRONIC SIGNATURE OF THE RIGHT
HOLDER, A PERSON AUTHORIZED TO ACT ON BEHALF OF THE RIGHT HOLDER, OR AN
ELIGIBLE PLAINTIFF UNDER § 11–1707(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) IDENTIFICATION OF THE INDIVIDUAL WHOSE VOICE OR
VISUAL LIKENESS IS BEING USED IN AN UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA;
(III) IDENTIFICATION OF THE MATERIAL CONTAINING AN
UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA, INCLUDING INFORMATION SUFFICIENT TO
ALLOW THE ONLINE SERVICE TO LOCATE THE ALLEGEDLY UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL
REPLICA;
(IV) INFORMATION REASONABLY SUFFICIENT TO ENABLE THE
ONLINE SERVICE TO CONTACT THE NOTIFYING PARTY, SUCH AS AN ADDRESS,
TELEPHONE NUMBER, AND E–MAIL ADDRESS;
(V) IF THE NOTIFICATION IS NOT PROVIDED BY THE RIGHT
HOLDER OR AN ELIGIBLE PLAINTIFF UNDER § 11–1707(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE, A
STATEMENT THAT THE NOTIFYING PARTY BELIEVES IN GOOD FAITH THAT THE
MATERIAL IS AN UNAUTHORIZED USE OF A DIGITAL REPLICA; AND
(VI) FOR PURPOSES OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
INFORMATION SUFFICIENT TO:
1. IDENTIFY THE REFERENCE OR LINK TO THE
MATERIAL OR ACTIVITY CLAIMED TO BE AN UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA THAT
IS TO BE REMOVED OR TO WHICH ACCESS IS TO BE DISABLED; AND
2. ENABLE THE ONLINE SERVICE TO LOCATE THE
REFERENCE OR LINK DESCRIBED IN ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM.
(2) IN A NOTIFICATION TO A DESIGNATED AGENT UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY AND MATERIALLY
MISREPRESENT THAT:
(I) THE MATERIAL REQUESTED TO BE REMOVED IS AN
UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA;

HOUSE BILL 1407
(II) A PERSON HAS THE AUTHORITY TO ACT ON BEHALF OF THE
RIGHT HOLDER; OR
(III) A DIGITAL REPLICA IS NOT AUTHORIZED BY THE RIGHT
HOLDER OR BY OTHER LAW.
(3) A PERSON THAT VIOLATES PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE LIABLE FOR DAMAGES IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE GREATER OF:
(I) $5,000; OR
(II) 1. ACTUAL DAMAGES, INCLUDING HARM TO AN ONLINE
SERVICE CAUSED BY THE RELIANCE OF THE ONLINE SERVICE ON THE
MISREPRESENTATION IN REMOVING OR DISABLING ACCESS TO THE MATERIAL OR
ACTIVITY CLAIMED TO BE AN UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA; AND
2. COSTS AND ATTORNEY’S FEES.
11–1707.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “VIOLATION” MEANS EACH DISPLAY, COPY MADE,
TRANSMISSION, AND INSTANCE OF THE UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA BEING
OTHERWISE MADE AVAILABLE ON AN ONLINE SERVICE, UNLESS THE ONLINE
SERVICE HAS TAKEN REASONABLE STEPS TO REMOVE, OR DISABLE ACCESS TO, THE
UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA AS SOON AS IS TECHNICALLY AND PRACTICALLY
FEASIBLE FOR THE ONLINE SERVICE AFTER ACQUIRING KNOWLEDGE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–1705(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) AN ACTION FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE BROUGHT BY:
(1) A RIGHT HOLDER;
(2) IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS A MINOR, A PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF THE
INDIVIDUAL;
(3) ANY OTHER PERSON THAT OWNS OR CONTROLS THE RIGHT TO
AUTHORIZE THE USE OF THE VOICE OR VISUAL LIKENESS OF A DECEASED
INDIVIDUAL; OR
(4) IN THE CASE OF A DIGITAL REPLICA INVOLVING A SOUND
RECORDING ARTIST, A PERSON THAT HAS, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, ENTERED
INTO:

HOUSE BILL 1407 13
(I) A CONTRACT FOR THE EXCLUSIVE PERSONAL SERVICES OF
THE SOUND RECORDING ARTIST; OR
(II) AN EXCLUSIVE LICENSE TO DISTRIBUTE OR TRANSMIT ONE
OR MORE WORKS THAT CAPTURE THE AUDIO PERFORMANCE OF THE SOUND
RECORDING ARTIST.
(C) AN ACTION MAY NOT BE BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION UNLESS THE
ACTION IS COMMENCED NOT LATER THAN 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE
PARTY SEEKING TO BRING THE ACTION DISCOVERED, OR WITH DUE DILIGENCE
SHOULD HAVE DISCOVERED, THE APPLICABLE VIOLATION.
(D) IT IS NOT A DEFENSE IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION
THAT THE DEFENDANT DISPLAYED OR OTHERWISE COMMUNICATED TO THE PUBLIC
A DISCLAIMER:
(1) STATING THAT THE APPLICABLE DIGITAL REPLICA WAS
UNAUTHORIZED; OR
(2) DISCLOSING THAT THE DIGITAL REPLICA WAS GENERATED
THROUGH THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE OR OTHER TECHNOLOGY.
(E) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, IN AN ACTION BROUGHT
UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) AN INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY THAT ENGAGES IN ACTIVITY
DESCRIBED IN § 11–1705(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE LIABLE TO THE INJURED
PARTY IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE GREATER OF:
(I) 1. IN THE CASE OF AN INDIVIDUAL, $5,000 PER WORK
EMBODYING THE APPLICABLE UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA;
2. IN THE CASE OF AN ENTITY THAT IS AN ONLINE
SERVICE, $5,000 PER VIOLATION; OR
3. IN THE CASE OF AN ENTITY THAT IS NOT AN ONLINE
SERVICE, $25,000 PER WORK EMBODYING THE APPLICABLE UNAUTHORIZED
DIGITAL REPLICA; OR
(II) ANY ACTUAL DAMAGES SUFFERED BY THE INJURED PARTY
AS A RESULT OF THE ACTIVITY, PLUS ANY PROFITS FROM THE UNAUTHORIZED USE
THAT ARE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE USE AND NOT TAKEN INTO ACCOUNT IN
COMPUTING THE ACTUAL DAMAGES;

HOUSE BILL 1407
(2) THE PLAINTIFF MAY SEEK INJUNCTIVE OR OTHER EQUITABLE
RELIEF;
(3) IN THE CASE OF WILLFUL ACTIVITY IN WHICH THE INJURED
PARTY HAS PROVEN THAT THE DEFENDANT ACTED WITH MALICE, FRAUD,
KNOWLEDGE, OR RECKLESS DISREGARD OF KNOWLEDGE THAT THE CONDUCT
VIOLATED THE LAW, THE COURT MAY AWARD TO THE INJURED PARTY PUNITIVE
DAMAGES; AND
(4) IF THE PREVAILING PARTY IS:
(I) THE PARTY BRINGING THE ACTION, THE COURT SHALL
AWARD REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES; OR
(II) THE PARTY DEFENDING THE ACTION, THE COURT SHALL
AWARD REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT THE
ACTION WAS NOT BROUGHT IN GOOD FAITH.
(F) IF AN ONLINE SERVICE HAS AN OBJECTIVELY REASONABLE BELIEF
THAT MATERIAL THAT IS CLAIMED TO BE AN UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA DOES
NOT QUALIFY AS A DIGITAL REPLICA AS DEFINED IN § 11–1701 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
THE ONLINE SERVICE MAY NOT BE HELD LIABLE FOR STATUTORY OR ACTUAL
DAMAGES EXCEEDING $1,000,000, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE MATERIAL IS
ULTIMATELY DETERMINED TO BE AN UNAUTHORIZED DIGITAL REPLICA.
(G) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF A THIRD
PARTY THAT PROVIDED THE MATERIAL THAT IS REMOVED BY THE ONLINE SERVICE,
OR TO WHICH THE ONLINE SERVICE HAS DISABLED ACCESS, FILES A LAWSUIT
AGAINST THE SENDER OF A NOTIFICATION UNDER § 11–1706(F) OF THIS SUBTITLE
CLAIMING THAT THE NOTIFICATION WAS FALSE OR DECEPTIVE AS DESCRIBED IN §
11–1706(F)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE ONLINE SERVICE MAY RESTORE THE
REMOVED MATERIAL TO ITS NETWORK FOR ACCESS BY MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC
WITHOUT MONETARY LIABILITY TO EITHER:
(I) THE NOTICE SENDER; OR
(II) THE THIRD PARTY THAT PROVIDED THE MATERIAL THAT
THE ONLINE SERVICE HAD REMOVED OR DISABLED ACCESS TO.
(2) AN ONLINE SERVICE MAY RESTORE THE REMOVED MATERIAL IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ONLY IF A THIRD PARTY

HOUSE BILL 1407 15
FILES THE LAWSUIT NOT LATER THAN 14 DAYS AFTER THE THIRD PARTY RECEIVES
NOTICE THAT THE ONLINE SERVICE HAS REMOVED THE MATERIAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) the right established under § 11–1702(a) of the Commercial Law
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall apply to an individual regardless of
whether an individual dies before or after the effective date of this Act; but
(2) Section 1 of this Act may not be applied or interpreted to establish
liability for conduct occurring, or a license or contract executed, before the effective date of
this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.